Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
CHAPTER 3 Exercise of Power of Eminent Domain for Special Purposes

Cross references.

Right of State Transportation Board to exercise right of eminent domain to acquire sites for airports, landing fields, and air navigation facilities, §

6-3-1

.

Power of municipal and county housing authorities to exercise power of eminent domain generally, §

8-3-31

.

Exercise of power of eminent domain for public school purposes, §

20-2-521

.

Authority of board of regents to exercise power of eminent domain, §

20-3-58

.

Authority of Department of Transportation to exercise power of eminent domain, § 32-2-2(a)(8).

Exercise of power of eminent domain for public road purposes, §

32-3-1

et seq.